public_html/app/tools/spellchecker/dictionaries/vec.aff
SFX A er emi/I ^persuàder
SFX A er emi/I ^persèguer
SFX A er emi/I ^pervèrter
SFX A er emi/I ^piòver
SFX A er emi/I ^reprímer
SFX A er emi/I ^romàñer
SFX A er emi/I ^rver
SFX A er emi/I ^skónder
SFX A er emi/I ^sorinténder
SFX A er emi/I ^spàrxer
SFX A er emi/I ^suàder
SFX A er emi/I ^vénŧer
SFX A er emi/I ^xberlúxer
SFX A er emi/I ^xgrénđer
SFX A er emi/I ^xlièđer
SFX A er emi/I ^àrder
SFX A er emi/I ^òser
SFX A er emi/I ^òñer
SFX A er emi/I barlúxer
SFX A er emi/I bàter
SFX A er emi/I bójer
SFX A er emi/I díxer
SFX A er emi/I dúxer
SFX A er emi/I estínguer
SFX A er emi/I fríđer
SFX A er emi/I fónder
SFX A er emi/I inténder
SFX A er emi/I kréder
SFX A er emi/I kòxer
SFX A er emi/I kórer
SFX A er emi/I lèđer
SFX A er emi/I lúxer
SFX A er emi/I méter
SFX A er emi/I mòver
SFX A er emi/I nàser
SFX A er emi/I néter
SFX A er emi/I piàxer
SFX A er emi/I pànder
SFX A er emi/I póner
SFX A er emi/I rónper
SFX A er emi/I rđer
SFX A er emi/I skríver
SFX A er emi/I strénđer
SFX A er emi/I sèguer
SFX A er emi/I sòrber
SFX A er emi/I tràer
SFX A er emi/I tèser
SFX A er emi/I ténder
SFX A er emi/I vèrter
SFX A er emi/I vèñer
SFX A er emi/I véder
SFX A er emi/I vínŧer
SFX A er emi/I víver
SFX A er emi/I xàser
SFX A er emi/I xàŧer
SFX A er emi/I ónđer
SFX A er emi/I ŧèrner
SFX A er emi/I ŧéder
SFX A er en/J [ao]er
SFX A er en/J [ao]ler
SFX A er en/J ^koñer
SFX A er en/J ^permaner
SFX A er en/J ^poder
SFX A er en/J ^remaner
SFX A er en/J aver
SFX A er en/J parer
SFX A er gomi/I tràer
SFX A er i/EF [aè]ler
SFX A er i/EF [aò]rer
SFX A er i/EF [km]òjer
SFX A er i/EF [lrè]đer
SFX A er i/EF [lrò]ver
SFX A er i/EF [lèò]xer
SFX A er i/EF [oò]ñer
SFX A er i/EFL [ct]èñer
SFX A er i/EFL [kps]òrxer
SFX A er i/EFL [luèò]der
SFX A er i/EFL [pt]ervèñer
SFX A er i/EFL [rtxđ]èmer
SFX A er i/EFL [èò]rder
SFX A er i/EFL [èò]ter
SFX A er i/EFL ^arvèñer
SFX A er i/EFL ^permaner
SFX A er i/EFL ^persèguer
SFX A er i/EFL ^pervèrter
SFX A er i/EFL ^remaner
SFX A er i/EFL ^soler
SFX A er i/EFL ^òser
SFX A er i/EFL rner
SFX A er i/EFL sèguer
SFX A er i/EFL sòrber
SFX A er i/EFL tràer
SFX A er i/EFL tèser
SFX A er i/EFL vèrter
SFX A er i/EFL vèñer
SFX A er i/L [ar]kòjer
SFX A er i/L [lè]xer
SFX A er i/L [sx]òlver
SFX A er i/L ^abòrer
SFX A er i/L ^espèler
SFX A er i/L ^koñer
SFX A er i/L ^lđer
SFX A er i/L ^mòjer
SFX A er i/L ^nòxer
SFX A er i/L ^piòver
SFX A er i/L ^rver
SFX A er i/L ^xlièđer
SFX A er i/L ^òñer
SFX A er i/L kòxer
SFX A er i/L lèđer
SFX A er i/L mòver
SFX A er i/L parer
SFX A er i/L rđer
SFX A er i/L valer
SFX A er imo/J [ao]er
SFX A er imo/J [ao]ler
SFX A er imo/J ^koñer
SFX A er imo/J ^permaner
SFX A er imo/J ^poder
SFX A er imo/J ^remaner
SFX A er imo/J aver
SFX A er imo/J parer
SFX A er ion/J [ao]er
SFX A er ion/J [ao]ler
SFX A er ion/J ^permaner
SFX A er ion/J ^poder
SFX A er ion/J ^remaner
SFX A er ion/J aver
SFX A er ion/J parer
SFX A er isen/J [ao]er
SFX A er isen/J [ao]ler
SFX A er isen/J ^koñer
SFX A er isen/J ^permaner
SFX A er isen/J ^poder
SFX A er isen/J ^remaner
SFX A er isen/J aver
SFX A er isen/J parer
SFX A er ision/J [ao]er
SFX A er ision/J [ao]ler
SFX A er ision/J ^koñer
SFX A er ision/J ^permaner
SFX A er ision/J ^poder
SFX A er ision/J ^remaner
SFX A er ision/J aver
SFX A er ision/J parer
SFX A er ison/J [ao]er
SFX A er ison/J [ao]ler
SFX A er ison/J ^koñer
SFX A er ison/J ^permaner
SFX A er ison/J ^poder
SFX A er ison/J ^remaner
SFX A er ison/J aver
SFX A er ison/J parer
SFX A er itu/M [ar]kòjer
SFX A er itu/M [bŧ]éver
SFX A er itu/M [cflprvŧ]énder
SFX A er itu/M [cj]ànxer
SFX A er itu/M [cs]éder
SFX A er itu/M [ct]èñer
SFX A er itu/M [ct]éñer
SFX A er itu/M [ek]lúder
SFX A er itu/M [en]xíjer
SFX A er itu/M [fkr]úxer
SFX A er itu/M [fpt]énxer
SFX A er itu/M [ikr]ànđer
SFX A er itu/M [ir]éser
SFX A er itu/M [kps]òrxer
SFX A er itu/M [krv]àder
SFX A er itu/M [lptŧ]énđer
SFX A er itu/M [lr]íxer
SFX A er itu/M [luèò]der
SFX A er itu/M [lè]xer
SFX A er itu/M [mpđ]ónxer
SFX A er itu/M [no]kónber
SFX A er itu/M [ns]pónder
SFX A er itu/M [nñ]óser
SFX A er itu/M [pt]ervèñer
SFX A er itu/M [rt]àxer
SFX A er itu/M [rtxđ]èmer
SFX A er itu/M [rvŧ]íder
SFX A er itu/M [sx]íster
SFX A er itu/M [sx]òlver
SFX A er itu/M [sx]úmer
SFX A er itu/M [èò]rder
SFX A er itu/M [èò]ter
SFX A er itu/M ^abòrer
SFX A er itu/M ^arvèñer
SFX A er itu/M ^asénter
SFX A er itu/M ^déver
SFX A er itu/M ^enténder
SFX A er itu/M ^espèler
SFX A er itu/M ^exímer
SFX A er itu/M ^fínxer
SFX A er itu/M ^infóter
SFX A er itu/M ^interdíxer
SFX A er itu/M ^interónper
SFX A er itu/M ^interŧéder
SFX A er itu/M ^lđer
SFX A er itu/M ^mòjer
SFX A er itu/M ^nòxer
SFX A er itu/M ^perinténder
SFX A er itu/M ^perkórer
SFX A er itu/M ^perméter
SFX A er itu/M ^persuàder
SFX A er itu/M ^persèguer
SFX A er itu/M ^pervèrter
SFX A er itu/M ^piòver
SFX A er itu/M ^reprímer
SFX A er itu/M ^romàñer
SFX A er itu/M ^rver
SFX A er itu/M ^skónder
SFX A er itu/M ^sorinténder
SFX A er itu/M ^spàrxer
SFX A er itu/M ^suàder
SFX A er itu/M ^vénŧer
SFX A er itu/M ^xberlúxer
SFX A er itu/M ^xgrénđer
SFX A er itu/M ^xlièđer
SFX A er itu/M ^àrder
SFX A er itu/M ^òser
SFX A er itu/M ^òñer
SFX A er itu/M barlúxer
SFX A er itu/M bàter
SFX A er itu/M bójer
SFX A er itu/M díxer
SFX A er itu/M dúxer
SFX A er itu/M estínguer
SFX A er itu/M fríđer
SFX A er itu/M fónder
SFX A er itu/M inténder
SFX A er itu/M kréder
SFX A er itu/M kòxer
SFX A er itu/M kórer
SFX A er itu/M lèđer
SFX A er itu/M lúxer
SFX A er itu/M méter
SFX A er itu/M mòver
SFX A er itu/M nàser
SFX A er itu/M néter
SFX A er itu/M piàxer
SFX A er itu/M pànder
SFX A er itu/M póner
SFX A er itu/M rónper
SFX A er itu/M rđer
SFX A er itu/M skríver
SFX A er itu/M strénđer
SFX A er itu/M sèguer
SFX A er itu/M sòrber
SFX A er itu/M tràer
SFX A er itu/M tèser
SFX A er itu/M ténder
SFX A er itu/M vèrter
SFX A er itu/M vèñer
SFX A er itu/M véder
SFX A er itu/M vínŧer
SFX A er itu/M víver
SFX A er itu/M xàser
SFX A er itu/M xàŧer
SFX A er itu/M ónđer
SFX A er itu/M ŧèrner
SFX A er itu/M ŧéder
SFX A er iven/J [ao]er
SFX A er iven/J [ao]ler
SFX A er iven/J ^koñer
SFX A er iven/J ^permaner
SFX A er iven/J ^poder
SFX A er iven/J ^remaner
SFX A er iven/J aver
SFX A er iven/J parer
SFX A er ivion/J [ao]er
SFX A er ivion/J [ao]ler
SFX A er ivion/J ^koñer
SFX A er ivion/J ^permaner
SFX A er ivion/J ^poder
SFX A er ivion/J ^remaner
SFX A er ivion/J aver
SFX A er ivion/J parer
SFX A er ivié/N [ao]er
SFX A er ivié/N [ao]ler
SFX A er ivié/N ^koñer
SFX A er ivié/N ^permaner
SFX A er ivié/N ^poder
SFX A er ivié/N ^remaner
SFX A er ivié/N aver
SFX A er ivié/N parer
SFX A er iviéu/O [ao]er
SFX A er iviéu/O [ao]ler
SFX A er iviéu/O ^koñer
SFX A er iviéu/O ^permaner
SFX A er iviéu/O ^poder
SFX A er iviéu/O ^remaner
SFX A er iviéu/O aver
SFX A er iviéu/O parer
SFX A er ivon/J [ao]er
SFX A er ivon/J [ao]ler
SFX A er ivon/J ^koñer
SFX A er ivon/J ^permaner
SFX A er ivon/J ^poder
SFX A er ivon/J ^remaner
SFX A er ivon/J aver
SFX A er ivon/J parer
SFX A er ié/N [ao]er
SFX A er ié/N [ao]ler
SFX A er ié/N ^koñer
SFX A er ié/N ^permaner
SFX A er ié/N ^poder
SFX A er ié/N ^remaner
SFX A er ié/N aver
SFX A er ié/N parer
SFX A er iéu/O [ao]er
SFX A er iéu/O [ao]ler
SFX A er iéu/O ^koñer
SFX A er iéu/O ^permaner
SFX A er iéu/O ^poder
SFX A er iéu/O ^remaner
SFX A er iéu/O aver
SFX A er iéu/O parer
SFX A er o/H [ar]kòjer
SFX A er o/H [ct]èñer
SFX A er o/H [kps]òrxer
SFX A er o/H [luèò]der
SFX A er o/H [lè]xer
SFX A er o/H [pt]ervèñer
SFX A er o/H [rtxđ]èmer
SFX A er o/H [sx]òlver
SFX A er o/H [èò]rder
SFX A er o/H [èò]ter
SFX A er o/H ^abòrer
SFX A er o/H ^arvèñer
SFX A er o/H ^espèler
SFX A er o/H ^koñer
SFX A er o/H ^lđer
SFX A er o/H ^mòjer
SFX A er o/H ^nòxer
SFX A er o/H ^permaner
SFX A er o/H ^persèguer
SFX A er o/H ^pervèrter
SFX A er o/H ^piòver
SFX A er o/H ^remaner
SFX A er o/H ^rver
SFX A er o/H ^soler
SFX A er o/H ^xlièđer
SFX A er o/H ^òser
SFX A er o/H ^òñer
SFX A er o/H kòxer
SFX A er o/H lèđer
SFX A er o/H mòver
SFX A er o/H parer
SFX A er o/H rđer
SFX A er o/H sèguer
SFX A er o/H sòrber
