public_html/app/tools/spellchecker/dictionaries/vec.dic
akuar/A
realdir/A
amar/A
reanemar/A
arđentar/A
armiđar/A
inasprir/A
aŧionar/A
inaxenir/A
badanar/A
xbaɉar/A
trabalar/A
xbalinar/A
inbalŧar/A
arbandonar/A
barar/A
barbotar/A
xbaroŧar/A
bastonar/A
batocar/A
inbavar/A
befar/A
xbeletar/A
xbertonar/A
bevaŧar/A
xbianŧar/A
abinar/A
birar/A
bivakar/A
xbocar/A
xboɉentar/A
bolar/A
xbolŧar/A
sorabondar/A
bordelar/A
xboskar/A
aboŧar/A
xbraitar/A
xbrajar/A
xbrasolar/A
xbrefelar/A
brikonar/A
xbrojar/A
brokolar/A
inbrular/A
xbruxar/A
bulegar/A
rebutar/A
xbuxinar/A
scarar/A
incefar/A
koncèñer/A
koncéñer/A
cexar/A
incodar/A
dar/A
dameɉar/A
prodegar/A
indeñar/A
dexeñar/A
disipar/A
dixnar/A
dolŧir/A
pardonar/A
dexdorar/A
dotorar/A
indubitar/A
reprodúxer/A
đèmer/A
inđónxer/A
konđurar/A
ekuipaɉar/A
entuxiaxmar/A
esplòder/A
exebir/A
desfar/A
stupefar/A
infagotar/A
falivar/A
desfangar/A
sfarinar/A
rinfaŧar/A
edifegar/A
paxifegar/A
infeltronar/A
fénxer/A
trasferir/A
festonar/A
fiabar/A
fiapir/A
fidar/A
fikar/A
sfilaŧar/A
fínxer/A
sfioriđar/A
infistegar/A
fluir/A
fogar/A
folar/A
sfondrar/A
deskonfortar/A
formigolar/A
straforŧar/A
fraɉar/A
frànđer/A
desfratar/A
perifraxar/A
frenar/A
fritolar/A
konfrontar/A
fugar/A
fumar/A
infuriar/A
gabar/A
ingalbanar/A
ingalopar/A
xgangir/A
xgarbar/A
xgargatar/A
ingateɉar/A
xgianŧar/A
xgobar/A
gondolar/A
ingoŧar/A
xgrafar/A
grandeđar/A
granxir/A
regraŧiar/A
traxgredir/A
ingrespar/A
ingringolir/A
xgriŧar/A
xgrongolar/A
gruñir/A
guadañar/A
guastar/A
ingurxitar/A
inibir/A
indasenar/A
infilŧar/A
inpedir/A
inritar/A
intimar/A
inxuriar/A
abiurar/A
inɉarar/A
inɉemar/A
inɉotar/A
kair/A
inkaenar/A
kajar/A
kalivar/A
kalmar/A
rekalŧar/A
kanar/A
skanbiar/A
inkankrenar/A
kanpionar/A
kantuŧar/A
inkapelar/A
skaponar/A
karatelar/A
inkarir/A
deskaroñar/A
karteđar/A
inkasar/A
inkastrar/A
katastegar/A
katurar/A
kavar/A
kavalkar/A
inkaxinar/A
inklúder/A
inkogolar/A
inkokalir/A
perkolar/A
kolpar/A
komenŧar/A
komunegar/A
konfesar/A
koniar/A
konpletar/A
konteđar/A
skontrar/A
koñar/A
dekórer/A
inkoraɉir/A
skordar/A
skornar/A
skorsiđar/A
kostipar/A
skoŧonar/A
krear/A
inkrespar/A
skrikolar/A
kronpar/A
krostolinar/A
rekuadrar/A
skuartar/A
deskuèrđer/A
skuinternar/A
rekular/A
rekuñar/A
skurŧar/A
deskúxer/A
xlangolir/A
laorar/A
xlargiđar/A
dexlaŧar/A
leamar/A
relegar/A
lesar/A
elevar/A
libar/A
xligar/A
linbelar/A
lisiar/A
logar/A
xlongar/A
xlovar/A
inlunar/A
lúxer/A
amaestrar/A
mainar/A
inmaltar/A
remandar/A
maneđar/A
mañar/A
marangonar/A
margotar/A
martoriđar/A
dexmaselar/A
mastegar/A
inmatonir/A
inmaxarar/A
međar/A
meɉorar/A
mendar/A
dexmentegar/A
meritar/A
eméter/A
preméter/A
inmielar/A
aministrar/A
dexmisiar/A
xmogar/A
molar/A
xmojar/A
morir/A
morsar/A
promòver/A
multar/A
musar/A
amutinar/A
inaspar/A
netar/A
nomenar/A
xñanfiđar/A
oficar/A
inonbrar/A
inorbar/A
ortigar/A
spacaŧar/A
spaɉar/A
spaludar/A
spanocar/A
konparer/A
inpartir/A
paseɉar/A
patentar/A
spaventar/A
apelar/A
depénder/A
inpensar/A
perkotar/A
petar/A
despetrir/A
sopiantar/A
pierar/A
pionbar/A
spisolar/A
aplàuder/A
despoltronar/A
inpóner/A
despontar/A
popetar/A
sposesar/A
spovolar/A
spreŧar/A
pronostegar/A
espuñar/A
rabir/A
rajar/A
rantegar/A
recar/A
rénder/A
ridakiar/A
robakiar/A
rolar/A
ropetar/A
inruđenir/A
dexruviɉar/A
konsakrar/A
resaltar/A
desapunir/A
scantiđar/A
insekir/A
prosèguer/A
inselvadegir/A
strasentir/A
aservir/A
sfriđegar/A
simular/A
skakañar/A
deskarpiar/A
iskenar/A
deskorŧar/A
skuarar/A
solajar/A
sonakiar/A
resòrxer/A
spaŧar/A
spetar/A
spirar/A
sporkacar/A
stabilir/A
stanpelar/A
stikar/A
stiŧar/A
instradar/A
stríder/A
strufiñar/A
stupinar/A
insultar/A
sutilar/A
stajuŧar/A
tanbukiar/A
tariđar/A
intavolar/A
proténder/A
atentar/A
manteñir/A
detéñer/A
desterminar/A
timonar/A
intokar/A
tonfolar/A
torniar/A
atràer/A
tragetar/A
kontratar/A
istremir/A
trinkar/A
trovar/A
stuŧegar/A
interŧéder/A
inŧeregar/A
reŧíder/A
postiŧipar/A
ŧukarar/A
uŧar/A
sprevaler/A
varar/A
stravéder/A
xvenar/A
arveñir/A
deskonvèñer/A
invergolar/A
divertir/A
dexveŧar/A
vinaŧar/A
konvíver/A
volar/A
dexvòlxer/A
sotoxàser/A
xburatar/A
xgañar/A
xmartir/A
dexunar/A
